th: เครื่องหมายโรงกษาปณ์: A; C; CC; D; M; ไม่มีเครื่องหมายโรงกษาปณ์; O; P; S; W; อื่นๆ
nl: Muntteken: A; C; CC; D; M; Geen muntteken; O; P; S; W; Overig
ru: Знак монетного двора: A; C; CC; D; M; Без знака монетного двора; O; P; S; W; Другое
da: Møntmærke: A; C; CC; D; M; Intet møntmærke; O; P; S; W; Andet
ja: ミントマーク: A; C; CC; D; M; ミントマークなし; O; P; S; W; その他
nb: Myntmerke: A; C; CC; D; M; Uten myntmerke; O; P; S; W; Annet
pl: Znak mennicy: A; C; CC; D; M; Brak znaku mennicy; O; P; S; W; Inne
cs: Značka mincovny: A; C; CC; D; M; Bez mincovní značky; O; P; S; W; Jiné
sk-SK: Značka mincovne: A; C; CC; D; M; Bez značky mincovne; O; P; S; W; Iné
pt-BR: Marca da casa da moeda: A; C; CC; D; M; Sem marca de cunhagem; O; P; S; W; Outra
vi: Dấu hiệu xưởng đúc: A; C; CC; D; M; Không có dấu xưởng đúc tiền; O; P; S; W; Khác
en: Mint mark: A; C; CC; D; M; No mint mark; O; P; S; W; Other
sv: Myntmärke: A; C; CC; D; M; Inget myntmärke; O; P; S; W; Annat
hu: Verdejegy: A; C; CC; D; M; Nincs verdejel; O; P; S; W; Egyéb
tr: Darphane damgası: A; C; CC; D; M; Darphane işareti yok; O; P; S; W; Diğer
zh-CN: 铸币标记: A; C; CC; D; M; 无铸币标记; O; P; S; W; 其他
fr: Marque d’atelier: A; C; CC; D; M; Aucune marque d’atelier; O; P; S; W; Autre
ro-RO: Semnul monetăriei: A; C; CC; D; M; Fără marcaj de monetărie; O; P; S; W; Altele
it: Segno di zecca: A; C; CC; D; M; Nessun segno di zecca; O; P; S; W; Altro
de: Münzzeichen: A; C; CC; D; M; Ohne Münzzeichen; O; P; S; W; Sonstige
fi: Rahapajan tunnus: A; C; CC; D; M; Ei rahapajan tunnusta; O; P; S; W; Muu
es: Marca de ceca: A; C; CC; D; M; Sin marca de ceca; O; P; S; W; Otro
bg-BG: Монетен знак: A; C; CC; D; M; Без маркировка на монетен двор; O; P; S; W; Друго
sl-SI: Oznaka kovnice: A; C; CC; D; M; Brez oznake kovnice; O; P; S; W; Drugo
zh-TW: 鑄幣廠標記: A; C; CC; D; M; 無鑄幣記號; O; P; S; W; 其他
ko: 조판창 기호: A; C; CC; D; M; 민트 마크 없음; O; P; S; W; 기타
lt-LT: Kalyklos ženklas: A; C; CC; D; M; Be kalyklos ženklo; O; P; S; W; Kita
el: Σήμα νομισματοκοπείου: A; C; CC; D; M; Χωρίς σήμα νομισματοκοπείου; O; P; S; W; Άλλο
pt-PT: Marca da casa da moeda: A; C; CC; D; M; Sem marca de casa da moeda; O; P; S; W; Outro
hr-HR: Oznaka kovnice: A; C; CC; D; M; Bez oznake kovnice; O; P; S; W; Ostalo